Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1987 to remove personal pronouns under sec. 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1987, 1992, 2004, 2012, and 2019 to make other minor word changes.

Collateral references. —

Thomas J. Touhey, Government Contracts: Law, Administration and Procedure (Matthew Bender).

Chester James Antieau, Local Government Law (Matthew Bender).

Lane K. Anderson, Accounting for Government Contracts: Cost Accounting Standards (Matthew Bender).

Lane K. Anderson, Accounting for Government Contracts: Federal Acquisition Regulation (Matthew Bender).